Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4134.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. Arizona fire service station equipment fund A. The Arizona fire service station equipment fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations.  Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. The department shall administer the fund and may adopt rules, policies and procedures to carry out the purposes of this section. B. The department shall grant monies to fire districts, tribal governments and municipalities in this state to provide kitchen equipment and supplies to fire stations.  An applicant shall submit an application for a grant on a form prescribed by the department. grant monies may be used to reimburse eligible applicants for purchases made within a calendar year of the application submission deadline as set by the department. C. At least twenty-five percent of grant monies must be awarded to fire districts. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; Arizona fire service station equipment fund; exemption A. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona fire service station equipment fund established by section 41-710.04, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.